Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 5. Children’s Trust Fund Act.

§ 93-21-301.
Short title.

Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311 shall be known as the “Children’s Trust Fund Act of 1989.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 509, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-21-303.
Declaration of policy.

The Legislature of the State of Mississippi finds and declares the policy of this state as follows:

The children of Mississippi are its single greatest resource and our children require the utmost protection to guard their future and the future of this state;

Child abuse and neglect are a threat to the family unit and impose major expenses on society in addition to the individual and collective damage on the children of this state;

There is a need to assist private and public agencies in identifying and establishing community-based educational and service programs for the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

An increase in educational, service and prevention programs will assist in breaking the cycle of child abuse and neglect and will assist in reducing the breakdown of families and thus reduce the need for state assistance and intervention and state expenses; and

Programs to prevent child abuse and neglect should be partnerships between citizens, local communities and the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 509, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-21-305.
Fund established; source of funds; interest; disbursements; purpose of fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Mississippi Children’s Trust Fund.”

The fund shall consist of any monies appropriated to the fund by the Legislature, any donations, gifts and grants from any source, receipts from the birth certificate fees as provided by subsection (2) of Section 41-57-11, and any other monies which may be received from any other source or which may be hereafter provided by law.

Monies in the fund shall be used only for the purposes set forth in Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311. Interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund shall be returned and deposited to the credit of the fund.

Disbursements of money from the fund shall be on the authorization of the Division of Family and Children’s Services of the State Department of Public Welfare.

The primary purpose of the fund is to encourage and provide financial assistance in the provision of direct services to prevent child abuse and neglect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 509, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-21-307.
Administration of fund; powers and duties of Division of Family and Children’s Services.

The administration of the Mississippi Children’s Trust Fund shall be vested in the Division of Family and Children’s Services of the State Department of Public Welfare. In carrying out the provisions of Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311, the Division of Family and Children’s Services shall have the following powers and duties:

To assist in developing programs aimed at discovering and preventing the many factors causing child abuse and neglect;

To prepare and disseminate, including the presentation of, educational programs and materials on child abuse and neglect;

To provide educational programs for professionals required by law to make reports of child abuse and neglect;

To help coordinate child protective services at the state, regional and local levels with the efforts of other state and voluntary social, medical and legal agencies;

To provide advocacy for children in public and private state and local agencies affecting children;

To encourage citizen and community awareness as to the needs and problems of children;

To facilitate the exchange of information between groups concerned with families and children;

To consult with state departments, agencies, commissions and boards to help determine the probable effectiveness, fiscal soundness and need for proposed educational and service programs for the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

To adopt rules and regulations, subject to approval of the State Board of Public Welfare, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law to discharge its responsibilities;

To report annually, through the annual report of the State Department of Public Welfare, to the Governor and the Legislature concerning the division’s activities under Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311 and the effectiveness of those activities in fostering the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

To recommend to the Governor and the Legislature changes in state programs, statutes, policies and standards which will reduce child abuse and neglect, improve coordination among state agencies which provide services to prevent abuse and neglect, improve the condition of children and assist parents and guardians;

To evaluate and strengthen all local, regional and state programs dealing with child abuse and neglect;

To prepare and submit annually to the Governor and the Legislature reports evaluating the level and quality of all programs, services and facilities provided to children by state agencies;

To contract with public or private nonprofit institutions, organizations, agencies or schools or with qualified individuals for the establishment of community-based educational and service programs designed to reduce the occurrence of child abuse and neglect;

To determine the eligibility of programs applying for financial assistance and to make grants and loans from the fund for the purposes set forth in Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311;

To develop, within one (1) year after July 1, 1989, a state plan for the distribution of funds from the trust fund which shall assure that an equal opportunity exists for establishment of prevention programs and for receipt of trust fund money among all geographic areas in this state, and to submit the plan to the Governor and the Legislature and annually thereafter submit revisions thereto as needed;

To provide for the coordination and exchange of information on the establishment and maintenance of local prevention programs;

To develop and publicize criteria for the receipt of trust fund money by eligible local prevention programs;

To enter into contracts with public or private agencies to fulfill the requirements of Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311; and

Review, monitor and approve the expenditure of trust fund money by eligible local programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 509, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-21-309.
Purposes for which grants or loans may be made from fund.

The division may authorize the disbursement of money in the trust fund in the form of grants or loans for the following purposes, which are listed in order of preference for expenditure:

To assist a community private, nonprofit organization or a local public organization or agency in the establishment and operation of a program or service for the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

To assist in the expansion of an existing community program or service for the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

To assist a community private, nonprofit organization or a local public organization or agency in the establishment and operation of an educational program regarding the problems of child abuse and neglect and the problems of families and children;

To assist in the expansion of an existing community educational program regarding the problems of child abuse and neglect and the problems of families and children;

To study and evaluate community-based prevention programs, projects or services and educational programs for the problems of families and children; and

Any other similar and related programs, projects, services and educational programs that the division declares will implement the purposes and provisions of Sections 93-21-301 through 93-21-311.

For the purposes of this section, the term “educational programs” includes instructional and demonstration projects the main purpose of which is to disseminate information and techniques for the prevention of child abuse and neglect and the prevention of problems of families and children.

No money in the trust fund shall be expended to provide services, counseling or direct assistance for the voluntary termination of any pregnancy.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 509, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-21-311.
Criteria for making grant or loan.

In making grants or loans from the trust fund, the division shall consider the degree to which the applicant’s proposal meets the following criteria:

Has as its primary purpose the development and facilitation of a community-based prevention program in a specific geographical area, which program shall utilize trained volunteers and existing community resources where practicable;

Is administered by an organization or group which is composed of or has participation by the county department of public welfare, the county health department, the youth court or chancery court, the office of the district attorney, county or municipal law enforcement personnel, county or municipal school officials, local public or private organizations or agencies which provide programs or services for the prevention of child abuse and neglect and educational programs for the prevention of problems of families and children; and

Demonstrates a willingness and ability and has a plan to provide prevention program models and consultations to appropriate organizations within the community regarding prevention program development and maintenance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 509, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1989.